Idaho statutes. Title 13 APPEALS IN CIVIL ACTIONS
Chapter 2
APPEALS TO SUPREME COURT FROM DISTRICT COURTS

Sec.

§ 13-201. Civil judgments and orders appealable — Time for taking appeals.

An appeal may be taken to the supreme court from a district court in any civil action by such parties from such orders and judgments, and within such times and in such manner as prescribed by rule of the supreme court.

§ 13-202. Stay of proceedings pending appeal.

Upon and after an appeal of a judgment or order of the district court in a civil action, the judgment or order appealed from, or any other order or proceeding in the action may be stayed by the district court or the supreme court as provided by rule of the supreme court.

If a plaintiff in a civil action obtains a judgment for punitive damages, the supersedeas bond or cash deposit requirements shall be waived as to that portion of the punitive damages that exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) if the party or parties found liable seek a stay of enforcement of the judgment during the appeal.

If the plaintiff proves by a preponderance of the evidence that a party bringing an appeal, for whom the supersedeas bond or cash deposit requirement has been waived, is purposefully dissipating its assets or diverting assets outside the jurisdiction of the United States courts, waiver may be rescinded and the bond or cash deposit requirements may be reinstated for the full amount of the judgment.

The supersedeas bond or cash deposit requirements may also be waived in any action for good cause shown as provided by rule of the supreme court.

Section 6 of S.L. 2003, ch. 122 provided: “This act shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2003. Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall apply to all causes of action which accrue thereafter. Section 4 of this act shall apply to all cases in which an appeal is filed thereafter.”
CASE NOTES

§ 13-203. Record on appeal.

The clerk’s record and reporter’s transcript in an appeal of a civil action to the supreme court shall contain such portions and documents of the proceedings in the district court, and be prepared, processed and transmitted to the supreme court as provided by rule of the supreme court.

§ 13-204 — 13-222. Mode of taking appeal — Undertaking on appeal — Stay of proceedings — Procuring transcript — Failure to furnish papers — Effect of dismissal — Certificate of clerk — Failure to perfect appeal. [Repealed.]